Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 4 PROVIDERS - REIMBURSEMENT
25.5-4-414. Providers - physicians - prohibition of certain referrals - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Designated health services" means any of the following services:

Clinical laboratory services;

Physical therapy services;

Occupational therapy services;

Radiology and other diagnostic services;

Radiation therapy services;

Durable medical equipment;

Parenteral or enteral nutrients, equipment, and supplies;

Prosthetics, orthotics, and prosthetic devices;

Home health services;

Outpatient prescription drugs; and

Inpatient and outpatient hospital services.

"Financial relationship" means an ownership or investment interest in an entity furnishing designated health services or a compensation arrangement between a provider or an immediate family member of the provider and the entity. An ownership or investment interest may be reflected in equity, debt, or other instruments.

"Immediate family member of the provider" means any spouse, natural or adoptive parent, natural or adoptive child, stepparent, stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, in-law, grandparent, or grandchild of the provider.

"Provider" means:

A doctor of medicine or osteopathy who is licensed to practice medicine pursuant to article 240 of title 12;

A doctor of dental surgery or of dental medicine who is licensed to practice dentistry pursuant to article 220 of title 12;

A doctor of podiatric medicine who is licensed to practice podiatry pursuant to article 290 of title 12;

A doctor of optometry who is licensed to practice optometry pursuant to article 275 of title 12; or

A chiropractor who is licensed to practice chiropractic pursuant to article 215 of title 12.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2), a provider participating in the medical assistance program under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title is prohibited from making a referral to an entity for designated health services for which payment may be made under the state's medical assistance program if the provider or an immediate family member of the provider has a financial relationship with the entity.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall not apply to any financial relationship that meets the requirements of an exception to the prohibitions established by 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395nn, as amended, or any regulations promulgated thereunder, as amended.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall not apply to a financial relationship or referral for designated health services if the financial relationship or referral for designated health services would not violate 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395nn, as amended, and any regulations promulgated thereunder, as amended, if the designated health services were eligible for payment under medicare rather than the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act".

An entity that provides designated health services as a result of a prohibited referral shall not present a claim or bill to any individual, any third-party payor, the state department, or any other entity for the designated health services.

An entity that provides designated health services shall provide to the state department, upon its request and in the form specified by the state department, information concerning the entity's ownership arrangements including:

The items and services provided by the entity;

The names and provider identification numbers of all providers with a financial interest in the entity or whose immediate family members have a financial interest in the entity.

If a provider refers a patient for designated health services in violation of paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section or the entity refuses to provide the information required in subsection (4) of this section, the state department may:

Deny any claims for payment from the provider or entity;

Require the provider or entity to refund payments for services;

Refer the matter to the appropriate agency for medical assistance fraud investigation; or

Terminate the provider's or entity's participation in the medical assistance program.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1849, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(d) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1708, § 180, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-410.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-415. No public funds for abortion - exception - definitions - repeal.

It is the purpose of this section to implement the provisions of section 50 of article V of the Colorado constitution, adopted by the registered electors of the state of Colorado at the general election November 6, 1984, which prohibits the use of public funds by the state of Colorado or its agencies or political subdivisions to pay or otherwise reimburse, directly or indirectly, any person, agency, or facility for any induced abortion.

If every reasonable effort has been made to preserve the lives of a pregnant woman and her unborn child, then public funds may be used pursuant to this section to pay or reimburse for necessary medical services, not otherwise provided for by law.

Any medically necessary services performed pursuant to this section shall be performed only by a provider who is licensed by the state and acting within the scope of the provider's license and in accordance with applicable federal regulations.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2021.)

Any physician who renders necessary medical services pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall report the following information to the state department:

The age of the pregnant woman and the gestational age of the unborn child at the time the necessary medical services were performed;

The necessary medical services which were performed;

The medical condition which necessitated the performance of necessary medical services;

The date such necessary medical services were performed and the name of the facility in which such services were performed.

The information required to be reported pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be compiled by the state department and such compilation shall be an ongoing public record; except that the privacy of the pregnant woman and the attending physician shall be preserved.

For purposes of this section, pregnancy is a medically diagnosable condition.

For the purposes of this section:

"Death" means:

The irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory functions; or

The irreversible cessation of all functions of the entire brain, including the brain stem.

A determination of death under this section shall be in accordance with accepted medical standards.

"Life-endangering circumstance" means:

The presence of a medical condition, other than a psychiatric condition, as determined by the attending physician, which represents a serious and substantial threat to the life of the pregnant woman if the pregnancy continues to term;

The presence of a lethal medical condition in the unborn child, as determined by the attending physician and one other physician, which would result in the impending death of the unborn child during the term of pregnancy or at birth; or

The presence of a psychiatric condition which represents a serious and substantial threat to the life of the pregnant woman if the pregnancy continues to term. In such case, unless the pregnant woman has been receiving prolonged psychiatric care, the attending licensed physician shall obtain consultation from a licensed physician specializing in psychiatry confirming the presence of such a psychiatric condition. The attending physician shall report the findings of such consultation to the state department.

"Necessary medical services" means any medical procedures deemed necessary to prevent the death of a pregnant woman or her unborn child due to life-endangering circumstances.

If any provision of this section or application thereof is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are declared severable.

Use of the term "unborn child" in this section is solely for the purposes of facilitating the implementation of section 50 of article V of the state constitution, and its use shall not affect any other law or statute nor shall it create any presumptions relating to the legal status of an unborn child or create or affect any distinction between the legal status of an unborn child and the legal status of a fetus.

This section shall be repealed if section 50 of article V of the Colorado constitution is repealed.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1851, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-142), ch. 168, p. 934, § 3, effective May 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-512 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-142, see section 1 of chapter 168, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

25.5-4-416. Providers - medical equipment and supplies - requirements.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "provider" means a person or entity that delivers disposable medical supplies or durable medical equipment products or services directly to a recipient.

On and after January 1, 2007, the state board rules for the payment for disposable medical supplies and durable medical equipment, including but not limited to prosthetic and orthotic devices, shall prohibit a provider from being reimbursed unless the provider:

Has one or more physical locations within the state of Colorado or within fifty miles of a border of Colorado with a street address, a local business telephone number, an inventory, and a sufficient staff to service or repair products; except that the requirements of this paragraph (a) shall not apply to durable medical equipment or disposable medical supplies that are medically necessary and cannot be purchased from a provider meeting the requirements of this paragraph (a);

Complies with all state and local licensing, insurance, and regulatory requirements for operating the provider's business;

Is responsible for the delivery of and instructing the recipient on the proper use of the equipment; and

Provides repairs, replacements, or adjustments to the provider's products pursuant to rules of the state board; or

Contracts with a provider who meets the criteria established in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2).

The provisions of this section shall apply to fee-for-service and primary care physician program recipients.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 525, § 1, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 26-4-410.7 in House Bill 06-1299. Section 2 of the act provided for the renumbering and relocation of § 26-4-410.7 to this section. (See L. 2006, p. 526.)

25.5-4-417. Provider fee - medicaid providers - state plan amendment - rules - definitions.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Local government" means a county, home rule county, home rule or statutory city, town, territorial charter city, or city and county.

"Provider fee" means a licensing fee, assessment, or other mandatory payment that is related to health-care items or services as specified under 42 CFR 433.55.

"Qualified provider" means a hospital licensed pursuant to section 25-3-101, C.R.S., or a certified home health-care agency within the territorial boundaries of the local government.

For the purpose of sustaining or increasing reimbursement for providing medical care under the state's medical assistance program and to low-income populations, the state department shall amend the state plan effective July 1, 2006. Implementation of the state plan amendment shall be subject to the approval of the federal government. The imposition and collection of a provider fee by a local government pursuant to article 28 of title 29, C.R.S., shall be prohibited without the federal government's approval of a state plan amendment authorizing federal financial participation for the provider fees.

In accordance with the redistributive method set forth in 42 CFR 433.68 (e)(1) and (e)(2), the state department may seek a waiver from the broad-based provider fee requirement or the uniform provider fee requirement, or both, to exclude qualified providers from the provider fee.

To the extent authorized by federal law, the state department may exclude a governmental qualified provider from payment of the provider fee, benefits from the provider fee, or any federal financial participation due to the fee.

To the extent authorized by federal law, the state department shall distribute the provider fee and any associated federal financial participation either to a local government that has certified payment to qualified providers within the local government or directly to the qualified providers. The state department shall establish reimbursement methods to distribute the provider fee and associated federal financial participation to qualified providers. The state department may alter reimbursement methods to qualified providers participating under the state's medical assistance program and Colorado indigent care program to the extent necessary to meet the federal requirements and to obtain federal approval of the provider fee. The state department shall work with a statewide association of hospitals on changes to reimbursement methods or provider fees that impact hospital providers. The state department shall work with a statewide association of home health-care agencies on changes to reimbursement methods or provider fees that impact home health-care agencies.

The state board shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration and implementation of this section.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 887, § 2, effective May 5.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 927, § 1, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 26-4-427 in Senate Bill 06-145 but was relocated due to its harmonization with this article as it appeared in Senate Bill 06-219.

25.5-4-418. Integration of physical and behavioral health services - department review - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1242), ch. 271, p. 1230, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2012. (See L. 2011, p. 1230.)

25.5-4-419. Supplemental state payment to qualified providers - office-administered drugs - no federal financial participation - definition - rules - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1330), ch. 146, p. 932, § 1, effective April 23.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2018, p. 932.)

25.5-4-420. Providers to obtain unique NPI - service site - provider type - definitions.

As used in this section:

"Health care clearinghouse" has the same meaning as set forth in 45 CFR 160.103.

"NPI" or "national provider identifier" means the standard, unique health identifier for health-care providers that is issued by the national provider system in accordance with 45 CFR part 162.

"Off-campus location" means a facility:

Whose operations are directly or indirectly owned or controlled by, in whole or in part, or affiliated with a hospital, regardless of whether the operations are under the same governing body as the hospital;

That is located more than two hundred fifty yards from the hospital's main campus;

That provides services that are organizationally and functionally integrated with the hospital; and

That is an outpatient facility providing preventive, diagnostic, treatment, or emergency services.

"Organization health-care provider" means a provider that is not an individual and includes a hospital.

"Subpart" has the same meaning as that term is used in 45 CFR part 162 and means a component or separate physical location of an organization health-care provider that may be separately licensed or certified by the state.

Each organization health-care provider and each subpart that is required or eligible to obtain an NPI pursuant to 45 CFR 162.410 must apply for, obtain, and use, on all claims for payment for medical care, services, or goods authorized under this article 4 and articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5, a unique NPI for each site at which the organization health-care provider or its subparts deliver medical care, services, or goods.

Each organization health-care provider and each subpart that is required or eligible to obtain an NPI pursuant to 45 CFR 162.410 must apply for, obtain, and use, on all claims for payment for medical care, services, or goods authorized under this article 4 and articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5, a unique NPI for each provider type, as specified by the state department, under which the organization health-care provider or its subparts deliver medical care, services, or goods.

An organization health-care provider or subpart submitting a claim for payment for medical care, services, or goods rendered under this article 4 or article 5 or 6 of this title 25.5 shall include on the claim the unique NPI that identifies both the site where the medical care, services, or goods were provided and the provider type, as specified by the state department, regardless of whether the claim is filed or submitted by or through a central office of the organization health-care provider or a health care clearinghouse.

For an organization health-care provider that is a licensed or certified hospital contracting for services under this article 4 and articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5, the hospital shall obtain and use a unique, separate, and distinct NPI for:

Its main campus;

Each off-campus location of the hospital; and

Each provider type, if specified by the state department, when the hospital delivers medical care, services, or goods at either the hospital's main campus or at an off-campus location.

A hospital submitting a claim for payment for medical care, services, or goods rendered under this article 4 or article 5 or 6 of this title 25.5 shall include on the claim the unique NPI that identifies both the site where the medical care, services, or goods were provided and the provider type, as specified by the state department, regardless of whether the claim is filed or submitted by or through a central office of the hospital or a health care clearinghouse.

Starting January 1, 2020, an organization health-care provider applying to enroll as a new provider under this article 4 and articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5 shall demonstrate that it has obtained one or more NPIs as required by this section, and upon enrollment, shall use its unique NPI on every claim for payment in the manner required by this section.

Starting January 1, 2021, an organization health-care provider enrolled and applying for revalidation as a provider under this article 4 and articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5 shall demonstrate that it has obtained one or more NPIs as required by this section as a condition of receiving revalidation, and upon receiving revalidation as a provider, shall use its unique NPI on every claim for payment in the manner required by this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1282), ch. 158, p. 1109, § 3, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1282, see section 1 of chapter 158, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-4-421. Supplemental state payment to qualified durable medical equipment providers - no federal financial participation - definition - rules - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1329), ch. 206, p. 1323, § 1, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2018, p. 1323.)

25.5-4-422. Cost control - legislative intent - use of technology - stakeholder feedback - reporting - rules.

It is the intent of the general assembly that:

The department of health care policy and financing pursue strategies to control costs in the medicaid program authorized in the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act";

The state department dedicate permanent staff and resources to pursue cost-control strategies, value-based payments, and other approaches to reduce the rate of expenditure growth in the medicaid program; and

This section not preclude the state department from pursuing other cost-containment activities that are not specifically described in this section.

The state department shall provide information regarding medicaid expenditures and the quality of medical services provided by providers participating in the medicaid program to providers participating in the accountable care collaborative pursuant to section 25.5-5-419.

The state department shall provide information regarding medicaid expenditures and the quality of available pharmaceuticals prescribed by providers participating in the medicaid program to providers participating in the accountable care collaborative pursuant to section 25.5-5-419.

The state department may provide the information described in subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section to other providers participating in the medicaid program.

The state department shall utilize the medicaid management information system to ensure that claims are automatically reviewed prior to payment to identify and correct improper coding that leads to inappropriate payment in medicaid claims.

The state department may procure commercial technology to implement the requirements of subsection (3)(a) of this section.

The state department shall pursue cost-control strategies, value-based payments, and other approaches to reduce the rate of expenditure growth in the medicaid program.

Prior to implementing and reporting on any new measures authorized by this section, the state department shall provide an opportunity for affected recipients, providers, and stakeholders to provide feedback and make recommendations on the state department's proposed implementation.

By November 1, 2018, the state department shall provide a report to the joint budget committee concerning:

The feedback received pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section;

The timelines for implementation of any cost-control measures enacted pursuant to this section; and

A description of the expected impact on recipients and recipients' health outcomes and how the state department plans to measure the effect on recipients.

The state department shall contract with a third party to perform an independent evaluation of the cost-control measures authorized pursuant to this section.

The state department shall provide a report to the joint budget committee on November 1, 2019, and November 1, 2020, detailing the results of the independent evaluation, including estimates of the cost savings achieved and the impact of the cost-control measures authorized pursuant to this section on recipients and recipients' health outcomes.

The state board shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration and implementation of this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-266), ch. 264, p. 1622, § 1, effective May 29.

25.5-4-423. Targets for investments in primary care.

The state department shall adopt appropriate targets for investments in primary care to support value-based health-care delivery in alignment with the affordability standards developed in accordance with section 10-16-107 (3.5). The state department shall consider the recommendations of the primary care payment reform collaborative created in section 10-16-150. Targets established under this section do not apply in the case of a nonprofit, nongovernmental health maintenance organization with respect to managed care plans that provide a majority of covered professional services through a single contracted medical group.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1233), ch. 194, p. 2123, § 7, effective May 16.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1233, see section 1 of chapter 194, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-4-424. State payments to qualified hospice providers - dually eligible persons - no federal financial participation - rules - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-214), ch. 89, p. 367, § 1, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2022. (See L. 2021, p. 369.)

25.5-4-425. Providers - health-care services related to labor and delivery - reimbursement.

The state department shall reimburse all eligible providers that provide health-care services related to labor and delivery within the scope of the provider's practice in a manner that:

Promotes high-quality, cost-effective, and evidence-based care;

Promotes high-value, evidence-based payment models; and

Prevents risk in subsequent pregnancies.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-194), ch. 434, p. 2871, § 6, effective September 7.

25.5-4-426. Supplemental state payment to urban Indian organizations - definition - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "urban Indian organization" has the same meaning as set forth in 25 U.S.C. sec. 1603 (29).

The state department shall distribute money appropriated for supplemental, state-only payments to urban Indian organizations to address health-care disparities among the urban Indian community.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1190), ch. 16, p. 128, § 1, effective March 7.